Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-3535
Applicability of sections.

Sections 71-3529 to 71-3536 shall not apply to a radiological instrument owned and replaced, repaired, or calibrated by the department, except when a responsible agency has been issued a radiological instrument and, by agreement, has consented to be responsible for the replacement, repair, and calibration of such instrument.

Laws 2006, LB 787, § 7;

Laws 2009, LB24, § 3.